Utah statutes.
63M-3-103.   Definitions.

As used in this act:

(1)  "Contractor" means the parties from private industry who design, construct, or operate the pilot plant.

(2)  "Council" means the state advisory council on science and technology.

(3)  "Intellectual property" means the sum of knowledge contained in patents, know-how, copyrights, trade secrets, and technical information relating to the pilot plant and the research which has preceded it.

(4)  "Objective period" means that period of time required for the pilot plant to achieve its design objectives.

(5)  "Pilot plant" means the tar sands pilot plant which is the subject of this act.

(6)  "Station" means the Utah engineering experiment station, University of Utah.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

